Hawaii, session 2026, GM1203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the coconut
rhinoceros beetle can have devastating impacts on palm species
that are foundational to the State's agricultural economy,
cultural heritage, and ecosystems. The use of fine mesh nets
can be an effective means of preventing adult coconut rhinoceros
beetles from accessing vulnerable plants, effectively mitigating
their impact on local plants and the environment.
The legislature further finds that even though Act 184,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, authorizes the department of
agriculture and biosecurity to adopt rules for the use of banned
monofilament netting, such power is only extended for bird
keeping. The legislature is concerned that, due to this
limiting authority, the ability of the department to adopt rules
to allow for the sale of monofilament netting for coconut
rhinoceros beetle interdiction may be thwarted.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
2026-3462 HB2207 GDI HMSO

Page 2 2207
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(1) Allow for the use of monofilament netting for purposes
of protecting plants against invasive species under
certain conditions; and
(2) Require the department of agriculture and biosecurity
to establish rules allowing the sale and distribution
of fine mesh nets, including certain monofilament
netting, in the State to protect plants from the
coconut rhinoceros beetle.
SECTION 2. Section 141-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§141-17 Fine [meehed] mesh nets; invasive species;
permissible; rules. (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, fine [iffteehed] me^h nets, including monofilament
netting of an appropriate mesh size, may be used for the
protection of plants against invasive species, as determined by
the department of agriculture and biosecurity; provided that the
fine [meehed] me^ nets shall be applied in a manner that is
unlikely to entangle birds, become dislodged and enter water, or
entangle or disturb native and beneficial animals, including but
not limited to pollinators, ladybugs or lady beetles, and
net-winged insects.
2026-3462 HB2207 CDl HMSO
liiniiiiiiiiniiiMiii

Page 3
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(b) The department of agriculture and biosecurity shall
adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 to implement this
section, including but not limited to establishing requirements
related to filament diameter, color, and the inclusion of visual
cues to prevent non-targeted entanglement [aftd]2_ prohibiting the
use of mist net material [that—io used] designed for bird
work[—]; and allowing the distribution and sale of fine mesh
nets, including monofilament netting of an appropriate mesh
size, for the sole purpose of protecting plants from the coconut
rhinoceros beetle (Oryctes rhinoceros)."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3462 HB2207 CDl HMSO 3

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2207, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2207, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
118-26